Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 9

International Banking

45-9-101. Legislative intent.

The general assembly declares that it is the purpose of this chapter to provide for the establishment of international banking and financial corporations chartered and operating under Tennessee law with powers sufficiently broad to enable them to compete effectively with similar institutions organized under other jurisdictions and laws, specifically institutions organized under § 25(a) of the Federal Reserve Act.

Acts 1983, ch. 104, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Reserve Act, referred to in this section, is codified throughout 12 U.S.C.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-9-102. Certificate of authority by commissioner.

The commissioner of financial institutions (hereinafter “the commissioner”) may grant a certificate of authority to any Tennessee corporation organized under this chapter for the purpose of engaging in international or foreign banking or other international or foreign financial operations; provided, that the corporation's charter is sufficiently limited so that no corporation organized under this chapter may carry on any part of its business in Tennessee or in the United States, except business that, in the opinion of the commissioner, is incidental to its international or foreign business.

Acts 1983, ch. 104, § 3; impl. am., 1983, ch. 216, §§ 1-9.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-9-103. Corporate charter.

To the extent that the charter of a corporation organized under this chapter is more limited or restrictive than this chapter otherwise permits, the corporation shall be bound by the terms of its charter until such time or times as that charter is amended, subject to the approval and acceptance of the commissioner, to incorporate any other provision or provisions permitted by this chapter.

Acts 1983, ch. 104, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-9-104. Applicability of other laws.

Chapters 1 and 2 of this title apply to any corporation organized under this chapter unless and to the extent the commissioner, exercising discretion, deems the provision or provisions or part of the provisions to be inconsistent with the purpose or purposes of this chapter or otherwise inapplicable to corporations organized under this chapter.

All other laws of Tennessee, except to the extent expressly inconsistent herewith, shall apply to corporations organized under this chapter.

Acts 1983, ch. 104, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-9-105. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner has the authority to issue rules and regulations that the commissioner, who has sole discretion with regard to the rules and regulations, deems necessary to carry out the purpose or purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1983, ch. 104, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).